District of Columbia statutes.
19-1511

Disclaimer of power held in fiduciary capacity.

(a)

If a fiduciary disclaims a power held in a fiduciary capacity which has not been exercised, the disclaimer takes effect as of the time the instrument creating the power becomes irrevocable.

(b)

If a fiduciary disclaims a power held in a fiduciary capacity which has been exercised, the disclaimer takes effect immediately after the last exercise of the power.

(c)

A disclaimer under this section is effective as to another fiduciary if the disclaimer so provides and the fiduciary disclaiming has the authority to bind the estate, trust, or other person for whom the fiduciary is acting.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).